Wisconsin, session 2025, AB175.
do enact as follows:AB175,11Section 1. 101.1115 of the statutes is created to read:AB175,2,52101.1115 Periodic inspection of parking structure. (1) In this section, 3“plan review authority” means the department or, if the city, village, town, or 4county within which a parking structure is located is authorized to perform 5examinations under s. 101.12, that city, village, town, or county.AB175,2,106(2) (a) The owner of a parking structure shall engage a professional engineer 7registered under s. 443.04 at least once within 5 years of the effective date of this 8paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], and at least once every 5 years after the most 9recent such inspection, to inspect the structural integrity of the parking structure 10to ensure that it can continue to meet the loads and uses for which it was designed.AB175,2,1211(b) An inspection of the structural integrity of a parking structure conducted 12under s. 101.02 (5) or (15) or 101.12 satisfies the requirement under par. (a).AB175,2,1613(c) The owner of a parking structure shall submit a report containing the 14results of an inspection required under par. (a), other than an inspection conducted 15under s. 101.02 (5) or (15) or 101.12, to the plan review authority of the parking 16structure.AB175,2,2017(3) (a) If the owner of a parking structure violates sub. (2) (a), the plan review 18authority of the parking structure, if not the department, shall notify the 19department of the violation no later than 30 days after the date by which sub. (2) (a) 20requires an inspection.AB175,2,2321(b) No later than 30 days after receiving notice under par. (a), the department 22shall notify the owner of the parking structure of the requirements and penalties 23under this section.AB175,3,41(c) For the period beginning 6 months after the date by which sub. (2) (a) 2requires an inspection and ending 12 months after the date by which sub. (2) (a) 3requires an inspection, the owner of a parking structure who violates sub. (2) (a) 4shall forfeit $200 for each month that the owner violates sub. (2) (a).AB175,3,95(d) One year after the date by which sub. (2) (a) requires an inspection, the 6department shall close a parking structure that has not been inspected as described 7under sub. (2) (a). If the plan review authority of the parking structure is a city, 8village, town, or county, the department shall notify the plan review authority of 9the closure of the parking structure.AB175,3,1410(e) If the department closes a parking structure under par. (d), and the 11parking structure is later inspected as described under sub. (2) (a) and the 12department allows the parking structure to reopen, and if the plan review authority 13of the parking structure is a city, village, town, or county, the department shall 14notify the plan review authority of the date that the inspection was conducted.AB175,3,1515